California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) If Golden State Energy is the successor to Pacific Gas and Electric Company and Pacific Gas and Electric Company made its initial contribution and, if applicable, annual contributions to the fund, the administrator shall not require Golden State Energy to commit to making, or make, its own initial contribution, or annual contributions for a period for which Pacific Gas and Electric Company already made its annual contributions, in order to participate in the fund and the administrator shall authorize Golden State Energy to participate in the fund if Golden State Energy, within 15 days of closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, notifies the commission of its commitment to make annual contributions to the fund.

(e) An electrical corporation that is the
 subject of an insolvency proceeding on July 12, 2019, that wishes to participate in the fund shall (1) no later than July 27, 2019, provide written notification to the commission of its election to participate in the fund, and (2) no later than September 10, 2019, obtain approval from the bankruptcy court or a court of competent jurisdiction of its determination to pay, and approval of its payment of, the initial contribution and, as they become due, annual contributions to the fund, provided that the contributions shall not be due to the fund until the date the electrical corporation exits the insolvency proceeding. The electrical corporation shall not be entitled to seek payments from the fund pursuant to subdivision (f) until it has funded its initial contribution and has met the other conditions provided in subdivision (b). Participation of an electrical corporation that is the subject of an insolvency proceeding that satisfies the requirements of this subdivision shall be effective as of July 12, 2019,
 and shall apply to covered wildfires, provided that the fund shall not pay more than 40 percent of the allowed amount of a claim arising between July 12, 2019, and the date the electrical corporation exits bankruptcy, with the balance of those claims being addressed through the insolvency proceeding.

(f) (1) An electrical corporation meeting the applicable requirements of subdivision (b) may seek payment from the fund to satisfy settled or finally adjudicated eligible claims. Only eligible claims shall be made against or paid by the fund. In accordance with the procedures established by the administrator, the administrator shall review and approve any settlement of an eligible claim as being in the reasonable business judgment of the electrical corporation before releasing funds to the electrical corporation for payment. Settlements of subrogation claims that are less than or equal to 40 percent of total asserted claim
 value as determined by the administrator shall be paid unless the administrator finds that the exceptional facts and circumstances surrounding the underlying claim do not justify the electrical corporation’s exercise of such business judgment. To the extent approved by the administrator, a settlement shall not be subject to further review by the commission.

(2) The administrator shall approve a settlement of an eligible claim that is a subrogation claim if the settlement exceeds 40 percent of the total asserted claim value, as determined by the administrator, and includes a full release of the balance of the asserted claim so long as the administrator finds that the electrical corporation exercised its reasonable business judgment in determining to settle for a higher percentage or on different terms based on a determination that the specific facts and circumstances surrounding the underlying claim justify a higher settlement percentage or
 different terms. A subrogation claim that is finally adjudicated shall be paid in the full judgment amount.

(g) Except for Golden State Energy, all initial and annual contributions shall be excluded from the measurement of the authorized capital structure.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), within six months after the commission adopts a decision in an application filed pursuant to Section 1701.8, the electrical corporation shall reimburse the fund for the full amount of costs and expenses the commission determined were disallowed pursuant to Section 1701.8.

(2) (A) The obligation of an electrical corporation to reimburse the fund shall be the lesser amount of subparagraph (B) or (C).

(B) The costs
 and expenses determined not to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 1701.8.

(C) (i) (I) The amount determined pursuant to sub-subclause (ia) minus the amount determined pursuant to
 sub-subclause (ib).

(ia) (IA) Except as specified in sub-sub-subclause (IB), for each electrical corporation, 20 percent of the electrical corporation’s total transmission and distribution equity rate base, including, but not limited to, its Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC)
 assets, as determined by the administrator for the calendar year in which the disallowance occurred.

(IB) For Golden State Energy’s first twelve months of participation in the fund, an amount equal to 20 percent of Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s total transmission and distribution equity rate base, including, but not limited to, its Federal Energy Regulatory Commission assets, at the time of the closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, as determined by the commission. For Golden State Energy’s subsequent years of participation in the fund, an amount determined by the commission that is equivalent to the amount specified in subclause (I) for
 electrical corporations with an equity rate base.

(ib) The sum of the amounts actually reimbursed to the fund for costs and expenses that were determined not to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 1701.8 during the measurement period, added to the amount of any reimbursements to the fund owed by the electrical corporation for costs and expenses disallowed during the measurement period that have not yet been paid.

(II) For purposes of this
 clause, “measurement period” means the period of three consecutive calendar years ending on December 31 of the year in which the calculation is being performed.

(III) This clause shall become inoperative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(ii) (I) The amount determined pursuant to sub-subclause (ia) minus the amount determined pursuant to sub-subclause (ib).

(ia) Twenty percent of the electrical corporation’s total transmission and distribution equity base, including, but not limited to, its Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) assets, as determined by the administrator for the calendar year in which
 the ignition of the covered wildfire occurred.

(ib) The sum of the amounts actually reimbursed to the fund for measurement costs that were determined not to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 1701.8 added to the amount of any reimbursements to the fund owed by the electrical corporation for measurement costs disallowed that have not yet been paid.

(II) For purposes of this clause, “measurement costs” means costs and expenses that arose out of any covered wildfire ignited within three years of the ignition of the wildfire that is the subject to the application and any measurement costs as defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3299.10.

(III) This clause shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section
 3299.

(D) The administrator shall publish calculations of the amounts determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) on or before January 1 of each calendar year for each electrical corporation.

(E) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the electrical corporation shall not be required to reimburse the fund for any additional amounts in any three-calendar-year period.

(F) The limitation set forth in this section shall apply only so long as the fund has not been terminated pursuant to subdivision (i).

(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply under either of the following circumstances:

(A) If the administrator determines that the electrical corporation’s actions or
 inactions that resulted in the covered wildfire constituted conscious or willful disregard of the rights and safety of others.

(B) If the electrical corporation failed to maintain a valid safety certification on the date of the ignition.

(i) (1) The administrator shall, to the extent practicable, manage the fund to prioritize the use of electrical corporation contributions before the use of ratepayer contributions.

(2) The fund shall terminate when the administrator determines that the fund resources are exhausted, taking into account the amount of any unpaid liabilities including necessary reserves, any remaining unpaid annual contributions from participating electrical corporations, and the charges authorized pursuant to Section 3289. Upon the determination of the administrator that the fund
 shall be terminated, the administrator shall pay all remaining eligible claims and fund expenses, and liquidate any remaining assets. The remaining funds shall be transferred to the General Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that any funds transferred to the General Fund pursuant to this paragraph shall be appropriated to support wildfire mitigation.
 Termination of the fund pursuant to this paragraph does not terminate the account within the fund, which shall continue until terminated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 3298.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), a regional electrical corporation’s access to the fund to pay eligible claims shall be limited to three times the sum of the regional electrical corporation’s initial contribution and any funded annual contributions per covered wildfire.

(k) (1) Each electrical corporation shall, upon determining that all of its claims, if any, for payment from the fund for a covered wildfire pursuant to subdivision (f) have been fully satisfied and that the large electrical corporation does not anticipate any further claims
 from a covered wildfire, shall notify the administrator that its claims for payment from the fund for a covered wildfire are fully satisfied.

(2) Upon receipt of all notifications pursuant to paragraph (1), the administrator shall determine whether there is any outstanding obligation on the fund to provide a payment pursuant to subdivision (f) to a large electrical corporation for a covered wildfire or whether any large electrical corporation is likely to submit any additional claims from a covered wildfire. If the administrator reasonably determines that there are no outstanding obligations on the fund to provide payment for a covered wildfire and that no large electrical corporation is likely to submit any additional claims from a covered wildfire, the administrator shall transfer any remaining Wildfire Fund assets, including all contributions and reimbursements to the fund pursuant to subdivision (h) that are made after the operative date of
 this subdivision, into the account.

(3) This subdivision shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 44.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3293.

A participating electrical corporation shall maintain reasonable insurance coverage. The administrator shall periodically review and make a recommendation as to the appropriate amount of insurance coverage required, taking into account the availability of insurance, the electrical corporation’s service territory, including the fire risk of the territory, the size of the territory, and the value of the real estate in the territory, the safety record of the electrical corporation, the wildfire mitigation measures implemented by the electrical corporation, the impact to the ratepayers, and other factors deemed appropriate by the administrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3294.

Costs and expenses of administration of the fund shall be paid from Wildfire Fund assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3295.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), within six months after the commission adopts a decision in an application filed pursuant to Section 1701.8, a governmental assessment shall be imposed in the full amount of, and the electrical corporation shall reimburse the fund for the full amount of, costs and expenses the commission determined were the amount of the obligation to reimburse the fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3291 or subdivision (h) of Section 3292 in a proceeding authorized pursuant to Section 1701.8.

(b) With respect to a governmental assessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the fund is granted a statutory lien on the revenues of an electrical corporation participating in the fund to secure the electrical corporation’s reimbursement
 obligations to the fund, which statutory lien shall be subordinated and junior in lien priority and right of payment to any lien, mortgage, or security interest securing any debt, note, indenture, lease, contract, or other obligation of the electrical corporation or a financing entity defined in Section 850 in existence on July 12, 2019, or thereafter authorized by the commission, including pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 80542 of the Water Code; provided that no such lien shall be deemed to have been granted with respect to the revenues of an electrical corporation to the extent that the terms of any debt, note, indenture, lease, contract, or other obligation of the electrical corporation existing on July 12, 2019, prohibits the granting of the lien, or if a breach or default would occur thereunder as a result of the granting of the lien whether or not the breach or default is subject to the passage of time, notice requirements, or otherwise, it being understood that the lien will be deemed to have
 been automatically granted at the time that the prohibition no longer applies or no breach or default would occur. Subject to the immediately preceding sentence, the subordinated and junior statutory lien shall be automatically perfected without further action of the fund and shall apply regardless of whether the amounts are commingled with other cash or other property of the electrical corporation. The statutory lien granted pursuant to this section shall not attach to any real property of an electrical corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 46.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3296.

In addition to any rights and remedies of the administrator provided by law, the administrator is authorized at any time and from time to time, without notice to the participating electrical corporations, to set off and apply any and all funds, deposits, or contributions from a participating electrical corporation at any time held by the fund and other obligations owed to the fund, irrespective of whether or not the administrator made demand, and whether the obligations may be contingent or unmatured. The administrator will promptly notify the participating electrical corporation after any such setoff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 47.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3297.

Fund earnings are tax exempt and fund contributions by electrical corporations are tax deductible for state tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 48.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Continuation Account [3298. - 3298.6.]

3298.

(a) There is hereby created the Continuation Account in the Wildfire Fund, which is hereby continued in existence, which is administered by the administrator. Moneys and invested assets in the account are separate and distinct from any moneys in the fund and shall be allocated solely for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3299).

(b) All of the following revenues shall be deposited into the account:

(1) The annual contribution and any additional contribution from a large electrical corporation pursuant to Section 3299.3.

(2) Revenues generated from the ratepayers of each large electrical corporation through
 a nonbypassable charge extended by the commission pursuant to Section 3299.2.

(3) Proceeds of bonds allocated to the account as provided in Section 80540 of the Water Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the account are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the administrator for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3299).

(d) (1) To the extent practicable, the administrator shall manage the account to prioritize the use of contributions from large electrical corporations before the use of contributions from ratepayers.

(2) The account shall terminate when the administrator determines that the resources are exhausted, taking into account the amount of any
 unpaid liability, including necessary reserves, any unpaid annual contributions and additional contributions from large electrical corporations, and the nonbypassable charge authorized pursuant to Section 3299.2. Upon the determination of the administrator that the account shall be terminated, the administrator shall pay all remaining eligible claims and account expenses, and liquidate any remaining assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 45.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.1.

The administrator shall carry out the duties of this part and may do all of the following, subject to the oversight of the council:

(a) Retain, employ, or contract with officers, experts, employees, accountants, actuaries, financial professionals, and other executives, advisers, consultants, attorneys, and professionals as may be necessary in the administrator’s judgment for the efficient operation and administration of the account.

(b) Enter into contracts and other obligations relating to the operation, management, and administration of the account.

(c) Invest the moneys
 in the account in those securities eligible under Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(d) Review and approve claims and settlements, and provide funds to large electrical corporations for the purposes of paying eligible claims.

(e) Buy insurance or take other actions to maximize the claims-paying resources of the account.

(f) Pay costs, expenses, and other obligations of the account from account assets.

(g) Take any actions necessary to collect any amounts owing to the account from large electrical corporations.

(h) Undertake other activities related to the operation, management, and administration of the account, as approved by the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 45.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.2.

There shall be a limited civil immunity, and no criminal liability in a private capacity, as a result of any act performed or omitted or obligation entered into in an official capacity, when done or omitted in good faith and without intent to defraud, on the part of the council, the administrator, or on the part of any officer, employee, or agent of the account. The State of California shall have no liability for payment of claims in excess of funds available pursuant to this part. The State of California, and any of the funds of the State of California, shall have no obligations whatsoever for payment of claims or costs arising from this part, except as specifically provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 45.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.3.

Upon the determination by the administrator that annual contributions are necessary pursuant to Section 3299.1, the council shall direct the administrator to prepare and present for approval a plan of operations related to the operations, management, and administration of the account on an annual basis. At least annually, the council shall direct the administrator to present the plan of operations to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The plan of operations shall include, but not be limited to, reporting on the account assets, projections for the durability of the account, the success of the account, whether or not the account is serving its purpose, and a plan for winding up the account if projections demonstrate that the account will be exhausted within the next three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 5.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.    Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.4.

The Director of Finance may, at any time, examine the books and records of the council and the administrator relating to the operation, management, and administration of the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 45.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.5.

(a) On January 1 of the year following the date on which the administrator determines that annual contributions are necessary pursuant to Section 3299.1, and annually thereafter, the council, with the assistance of the administrator, shall prepare and file with the Legislature and the Department of Finance reports regarding the formation, administration, and disposition of the account.

(b) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 3298.6.    Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3298.6.

This chapter shall become inoperative if a large electrical corporation elects not to participate pursuant to Section 3299 and is repealed on January 1 of the year following the notification by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3299.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 45.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 4, commencing with Section 3298.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Operation of the Account [3299. - 3299.20.]

3299.

(a) (1) (A) Within 15 days of the effective date of this chapter, each large electrical corporation shall provide to the commission a written notification of its election to participate, or not to participate, in the account and provide, if applicable, annual contributions and additional contributions pursuant to this chapter.

(B) A large electrical corporation’s election to participate in the account shall be considered as its agreement to do all of the following:

(i) To authorize the administration of the account by the administrator pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3298).

(ii) To provide an annual contribution pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3299.3 and any additional contributions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3299.3.

(iii) To consent to the changes in the operation of the fund as provided in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of, and subdivision (k) of, Section 3292, as those provisions read on the effective date of this chapter.

(iv) To authorize the use of the Wildfire Fund assets and account assets for purposes of Section 719, as added by the measure adding this chapter.

(2) A large electrical corporation that fails to provide the notification pursuant to this subdivision is deemed to have elected not to participate in the account.

(b) If all large electrical corporations provide written notification to the commission of their election to participate in the account and their commitment to provide annual contributions and additional contributions pursuant to this chapter, the commission shall notify the administrator, the Secretary of State, and the relevant policy committees of the Legislature of the election.

(c) If a notification provided pursuant to subdivision (a) indicates that a large electrical corporation has elected not to participate in the account, or if a large electrical corporation fails to provide the notification pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall provide notification of the nonparticipation to the administrator, Secretary of State, and the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and this chapter shall become inoperative on the date of the notification and is repealed on
 January 1 of the year following the notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5, commencing with Section 3299; see additional repeal provisions in Section 3299.20.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.1.

(a) On or after the date the commission provides the notification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3299, but not later than December 31, 2028, the administrator may determine if annual contributions pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3299.3 are required for either of the following reasons:

(1) Absent annual contributions, the administrator would provide a plan for winding up the fund pursuant to Section 3283.

(2) The administrator receives a notification from a large electrical corporation that it has a reasonable belief that it likely will have eligible claims for a single coverage year resulting from one or more covered wildfires.

(b) If the administrator determines that annual contributions are required, the administrator shall provide notification to the commission, the Department of Water Resources, and each large electrical corporation of its determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Sections 3299 and 3299.20.    Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.2.

(a) Within 15 days of receiving the notification pursuant to Section 3299.1, the commission shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding to consider using its authority pursuant to Section 701 to require each large electrical corporation to collect a nonbypassable charge from ratepayers of each large electrical corporation to support the account, including the payment of bonds issued pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 80540 of the Water Code, in an amount sufficient to fund the revenue requirement as established pursuant to Section 80524 of the Water Code.

(b) If the commission determines that the imposition of the charge described in subdivision (a) is just and reasonable, and that it is just and reasonable to exercise its
 authority pursuant to Section 701 to do so, the commission shall direct each large electrical corporation to impose and collect that charge commencing February 1, 2036. The charge shall be collected in the same manner as that for the payments made to reimburse the Department of Water Resources under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3289.

(c) Notwithstanding other law, no later than 90 days after the initiation of the rulemaking proceeding, the commission shall adopt a decision regarding the imposition of the charge.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 455.5 and 1708, or any other law, the commission shall not revise, amend, or otherwise modify a decision to impose a charge imposed pursuant to this section before January 1, 2046.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Sections 3299 and 3299.20.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.3.

(a) (1) If the commission imposes a nonbypassable charge pursuant to Section 3299.2, each large electrical corporation shall provide to the administrator for deposit into the account its annual contribution, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2), by January 1 of each year from calendar year 2029 to 2045, inclusive, except, if the commission’s decision to impose the nonbypassable charge was made on or after January 1, 2029, the annual contribution for calendar year 2029 shall be made within 90 days of the commission’s decision.

(2) The aggregate total of the annual contributions from the large electrical corporations for each year shall be three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) and shall be allocated as
 follows:

(A) 47.85 percent for Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(B) 47.85 percent for Southern California Edison Company.

(C) 4.30 percent for San Diego Gas and Electric Company.

(b) (1) In addition to subdivision (a), if the administrator determines that additional contributions from large electrical corporations are needed to enable the account to fund the timely payment of eligible claims due to the likelihood of exhaustion of revenues in the account, including the proceeds to bonds issued pursuant to Section 80540 of the Water Code, the administrator shall notify each large electrical corporation that additional contributions, with an aggregate total of three billion nine hundred million dollars ($3,900,000,000), is required.
 The proportionate share of those additional contributions shall be allocated to large electrical corporations as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and each large electrical corporation shall pay its proportionate share of the additional contributions to the administrator in equal installments over a five-year period. Each large electrical corporation shall pay its proportionate share of the additional contributions within 120 days of the administrator notifying the large electrical corporation and on the anniversary of its first installment payment each year thereafter.

(2) If the administrator winds up and terminates the account before the final installment payment is paid pursuant to paragraph (1), the large electrical corporation shall provide one-half of the remaining unpaid installment payments pursuant to paragraph (1) as rate credits to its ratepayers.

(c) Contributions made pursuant to this section shall not be recovered from the ratepayers of a large electrical corporation and shall be excluded from the measurement of its authorized capital structure.

(d) If a large electrical corporation is required to reimburse the account in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 3299.10, the large electrical corporation may reduce the amount required to be reimbursed by the amount of contributions it has paid pursuant to this section for which the large electrical corporation has not claimed a reduction pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Sections 3299 and 3299.20.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.4.

A large electrical corporation shall maintain reasonable insurance coverage. The administrator shall periodically review and make a recommendation as to the appropriate amount of insurance coverage required, taking into account the availability of insurance, the large electrical corporation’s service territory, including the fire risk of the territory, the size of the territory, and the value of the real estate in the territory, the safety record of the large electrical corporation, the wildfire mitigation measures implemented by the large electrical corporation, the impact to the ratepayers, and other factors deemed appropriate by the administrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Sections 3299 and 3299.20.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.10.

(a) A large electrical corporation may seek payment from the account to satisfy settled or finally adjudicated eligible claims. Only eligible claims shall be made against or paid by the account. In accordance with the procedures established by the administrator, the administrator shall review and approve any settlement of an eligible claim as being in the reasonable business judgment of the large electrical corporation before releasing funds to the large electrical corporation for payment. To the extent approved by the administrator, a settlement shall not be subject to further review by the commission.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), within six months of the commission adopting a decision for an application
 filed pursuant to Section 1701.8, a large electrical corporation shall reimburse the account for the full amount of costs and expenses the commission determined were disallowed pursuant to Section 1701.8.

(2) (A) The requirement on a large electrical corporation to reimburse the account shall be the lesser amount of subparagraph (B) or (C).

(B) The costs and expenses determined not to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 1701.8.

(C) (i) The amount determined pursuant to clause (ii) minus the amount determined pursuant to clause (iii).

(ii) Twenty percent of the large electrical corporation’s total transmission and distribution equity rate base, including, but not limited to, its Federal Energy Regulatory
 Commission (FERC) assets, as determined by the administrator for the calendar year in which the ignition of the covered wildfire occurred.

(iii) The sum of the amounts actually reimbursed to the account for measurement costs that were determined not to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 1701.8 added to the amount of any reimbursements to the account owed by the large electrical corporation for measurement costs disallowed that have not yet been paid.

(iv) For purposes of this subparagraph, “measurement costs” means costs and expenses that arose out of any covered wildfire ignited within three years of the ignition of the wildfire that is the subject of the application and any measurement costs as defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 3292.

(D) The administrator shall
 publish calculations of the amounts determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) on or before January 1 of each calendar year for each large electrical corporation.

(E) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a large electrical corporation shall not be required to reimburse the account for any additional amounts for any measurement period.

(F) The limitation set forth in this section shall apply only so long as the account has not been terminated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 3298.

(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply under either of the following circumstances:

(A) If the administrator determines that the large electrical corporation’s actions or inactions that resulted in the covered wildfire constituted conscious or willful
 disregard of the rights and safety of others.

(B) If the large electrical corporation failed to maintain a valid safety certification on the date of the ignition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Sections 3299 and 3299.20.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

3299.20.

This chapter shall become inoperative if a large electrical corporation elects not to participate pursuant to Section 3299 and is repealed on January 1 of the year following a notification by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3299.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 46.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5, commencing with Section 3299; see additional repeal provisions in Section 3299.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Right of First Refusal of an electrical Corporation [3299.100. - 3299.100.]

3299.100.

(a) For purposes of this section, “third-party entity” means an entity, other than a large electrical corporation, other insurer or reinsurer admitted to conduct the business of insurance in California or in compliance with Sections 1765.1 and 1765.2 of the Insurance Code, or a law firm or business retained by an insurer for the purpose of assisting with the pursuit of the property insurer’s subrogation rights, that seeks to enter into an agreement with a property insurer.

(b) Any agreement entered into on or after the effective date of this chapter by a property insurer to sell, assign, or transfer, in whole or in part, to a third-party entity, a right of subrogation, reimbursement, or recovery, as applicable, including a right to recover
 attorney fees, resulting from a wildfire that is ignited on or after the effective date of this chapter and that destroys 1,000 or more structures is subject to all of the following:

(1) Before entering into an agreement with the third-party entity, the property insurer shall first offer to settle its right of subrogation, reimbursement, or recovery, as applicable, on the same terms and conditions as the proposed agreement, to the large electrical corporation, if any, that provides electrical service to the service area in which the wildfire ignited.

(2) Within 30 days of the property insurer making the offer to settle pursuant to paragraph (1), the large electrical corporation shall accept or reject the offer to settle or otherwise reach an agreement on mutually agreeable terms with the property insurer for the settlement of that right with the large electrical corporation.

(3) If the large electrical corporation accepts the property insurer’s offer to settle, or otherwise reaches an agreement with the property insurer on mutually agreeable terms, the property insurer shall execute a release that will release the large electrical corporation from, and bar the property insurer from bringing or pursuing, any lawsuit, claim, arbitration, or other legal action of any kind against the large electrical corporation for damages resulting from the applicable fire with respect to the rights sold, assigned, or transferred to the electrical corporation. The release shall not preclude actions to enforce the terms of the accepted offer or agreement between the electrical corporation and the property insurer.

(4) If the large electrical corporation rejects the offer made, or fails to reach an agreement within 30 days, pursuant to paragraph (2), the property insurer
 and the third-party entity may enter into an agreement for the sale, assignment, or transfer of the right under either of the following conditions:
